Illinois, session 104th, HB2390.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.31 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.31)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.31)7    Sec. 10-22.31. Special education. 8    (a) To enter into joint agreements with other school 9boards to provide the needed special educational facilities 10and to employ a director and other professional workers as 11defined in Section 14-1.10 and to establish facilities as 12defined in Section 14-1.08 for the types of children described 13in Sections 14-1.02 and 14-1.03a. The director (who may be 14employed under a contract as provided in subsection (c) of 15this Section) and other professional workers may be employed 16by one district, which shall be reimbursed on a mutually 17agreed basis by other districts that are parties to the joint 18agreement. Such agreements may provide that one district may 19supply professional workers for a joint program conducted in 20another district. Such agreement shall provide that any 21full-time professional worker who is employed by a joint 22agreement program and spends over 50% of his or her time in one 23school district shall not be required to work a different   HB2390 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1teaching schedule than the other professional worker in that 2district. Such agreement shall include, but not be limited to, 3provisions for administration, staff, programs, financing, 4housing, transportation, an advisory body, and the method or 5methods to be employed for disposing of property upon the 6withdrawal of a school district or dissolution of the joint 7agreement and shall specify procedures for the withdrawal of 8districts from the joint agreement as long as these procedures 9are consistent with this Section. Such agreement may be 10amended at any time as provided in the joint agreement or, if 11the joint agreement does not so provide, then such agreement 12may be amended at any time upon the adoption of concurring 13resolutions by the school boards of all member districts, 14provided that no later than 6 months after August 28, 2009 (the 15effective date of Public Act 96-783), all existing agreements 16shall be amended to be consistent with Public Act 96-783. Such 17an amendment may include the removal of a school district from 18or the addition of a school district to the joint agreement 19without a petition as otherwise required in this Section if 20all member districts adopt concurring resolutions to that 21effect. A fully executed copy of any such agreement or 22amendment entered into on or after January 1, 1989 shall be 23filed with the State Board of Education. Petitions for 24withdrawal shall be made to the regional board or boards of 25school trustees exercising oversight or governance over any of 26the districts in the joint agreement. Upon receipt of a   HB2390 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1petition for withdrawal, the regional board of school trustees 2shall publish notice of and conduct a hearing or, in instances 3in which more than one regional board of school trustees 4exercises oversight or governance over any of the districts in 5the joint agreement, a joint hearing, in accordance with rules 6adopted by the State Board of Education. In instances in which 7a single regional board of school trustees holds the hearing, 8approval of the petition must be by a two-thirds majority vote 9of the school trustees. In instances in which a joint hearing 10of 2 or more regional boards of school trustees is required, 11approval of the petition must be by a two-thirds majority of 12all those school trustees present and voting. Notwithstanding 13the provisions of Article 6 of this Code, in instances in which 14the competent regional board or boards of school trustees has 15been abolished, petitions for withdrawal shall be made to the 16school boards of those districts that fall under the oversight 17or governance of the abolished regional board of school 18trustees in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board 19of Education. If any petition is approved pursuant to this 20subsection (a), the withdrawal takes effect as provided in 21Section 7-9 of this Act. The changes to this Section made by 22Public Act 96-769 apply to all changes to special education 23joint agreement membership initiated after July 1, 2009.24    (b) To either (1) designate an administrative district to 25act as fiscal and legal agent for the districts that are 26parties to the joint agreement, or (2) designate a governing   HB2390 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1board composed of one member of the school board of each 2cooperating district and designated by such boards to act in 3accordance with the joint agreement. No such governing board 4may levy taxes and no such governing board may incur any 5indebtedness except within an annual budget for the joint 6agreement approved by the governing board and by the boards of 7at least a majority of the cooperating school districts or a 8number of districts greater than a majority if required by the 9joint agreement. The governing board may appoint an executive 10board of at least 7 members to administer the joint agreement 11in accordance with its terms. However, if 7 or more school 12districts are parties to a joint agreement that does not have 13an administrative district: (i) at least a majority of the 14members appointed by the governing board to the executive 15board shall be members of the school boards of the cooperating 16districts; or (ii) if the governing board wishes to appoint 17members who are not school board members, they shall be 18superintendents from the cooperating districts.19    (c) To employ a full-time director of special education of 20the joint agreement program under a one-year or multi-year 21contract. No such contract can be offered or accepted for less 22than one year. Such contract may be discontinued at any time by 23mutual agreement of the contracting parties, or may be 24extended for an additional one-year or multi-year period at 25the end of any year.26    The contract year is July 1 through the following June   HB2390 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b130th, unless the contract specifically provides otherwise. 2Notice of intent not to renew a contract when given by a 3controlling board or administrative district must be in 4writing stating the specific reason therefor. Notice of intent 5not to renew the contract must be given by the controlling 6board or the administrative district at least 90 days before 7the contract expires. Failure to do so will automatically 8extend the contract for one additional year.9    By accepting the terms of the contract, the director of a 10special education joint agreement waives all rights granted 11under Sections 24-11 through 24-16 for the duration of his or 12her employment as a director of a special education joint 13agreement.14    (d) To designate a district that is a party to the joint 15agreement as the issuer of bonds or notes for the purposes and 16in the manner provided in this Section. It is not necessary for 17such district to also be the administrative district for the 18joint agreement, nor is it necessary for the same district to 19be designated as the issuer of all series of bonds or notes 20issued hereunder. Any district so designated may, from time to 21time, borrow money and, in evidence of its obligation to repay 22the borrowing, issue its negotiable bonds or notes for the 23purpose of acquiring, constructing, altering, repairing, 24enlarging and equipping any building or portion thereof, 25together with any land or interest therein, necessary to 26provide special educational facilities and services as defined   HB2390 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1in Section 14-1.08. Title in and to any such facilities shall 2be held in accordance with the joint agreement.3    Any such bonds or notes shall be authorized by a 4resolution of the board of education of the issuing district. 5The resolution may contain such covenants as may be deemed 6necessary or advisable by the district to assure the payment 7of the bonds or notes. The resolution shall be effective 8immediately upon its adoption.9    Prior to the issuance of such bonds or notes, each school 10district that is a party to the joint agreement shall agree, 11whether by amendment to the joint agreement or by resolution 12of the board of education, to be jointly and severally liable 13for the payment of the bonds and notes. The bonds or notes 14shall be payable solely and only from the payments made 15pursuant to such agreement.16    Neither the bonds or notes nor the obligation to pay the 17bonds or notes under any joint agreement shall constitute an 18indebtedness of any district, including the issuing district, 19within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory 20limitation.21    As long as any bonds or notes are outstanding and unpaid, 22the agreement by a district to pay the bonds and notes shall be 23irrevocable notwithstanding the district's withdrawal from 24membership in the joint special education program.25    (e) If a district whose employees are on strike was, prior 26to the strike, sending students with disabilities to special   HB2390 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1educational facilities and services in another district or 2cooperative, the district affected by the strike shall 3continue to send such students during the strike and shall be 4eligible to receive appropriate State reimbursement.5    (f) With respect to those joint agreements that have a 6governing board composed of one member of the school board of 7each cooperating district and designated by those boards to 8act in accordance with the joint agreement, the governing 9board shall have, in addition to its other powers under this 10Section, the authority to issue bonds or notes for the 11purposes and in the manner provided in this subsection. The 12governing board of the joint agreement may from time to time 13borrow money and, in evidence of its obligation to repay the 14borrowing, issue its negotiable bonds or notes for the purpose 15of acquiring, constructing, altering, repairing, enlarging and 16equipping any building or portion thereof, together with any 17land or interest therein, necessary to provide special 18educational facilities and services as defined in Section 1914-1.08 and including also facilities for activities of 20administration and educational support personnel employees. 21Title in and to any such facilities shall be held in accordance 22with the joint agreement.23    Any such bonds or notes shall be authorized by a 24resolution of the governing board. The resolution may contain 25such covenants as may be deemed necessary or advisable by the 26governing board to assure the payment of the bonds or notes and   HB2390 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1interest accruing thereon. The resolution shall be effective 2immediately upon its adoption.3    Each school district that is a party to the joint 4agreement shall be automatically liable, by virtue of its 5membership in the joint agreement, for its proportionate share 6of the principal amount of the bonds and notes plus interest 7accruing thereon, as provided in the resolution. Subject to 8the joint and several liability hereinafter provided for, the 9resolution may provide for different payment schedules for 10different districts except that the aggregate amount of 11scheduled payments for each district shall be equal to its 12proportionate share of the debt service in the bonds or notes 13based upon the fraction that its equalized assessed valuation 14bears to the total equalized assessed valuation of all the 15district members of the joint agreement as adjusted in the 16manner hereinafter provided. In computing that fraction the 17most recent available equalized assessed valuation at the time 18of the issuance of the bonds and notes shall be used, and the 19equalized assessed valuation of any district maintaining 20grades K to 12 shall be doubled in both the numerator and 21denominator of the fraction used for all of the districts that 22are members of the joint agreement. In case of default in 23payment by any member, each school district that is a party to 24the joint agreement shall automatically be jointly and 25severally liable for the amount of any deficiency. The bonds 26or notes and interest thereon shall be payable solely and only   HB2390 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1from the funds made available pursuant to the procedures set 2forth in this subsection. No project authorized under this 3subsection may require an annual contribution for bond 4payments from any member district in excess of 0.15% of the 5value of taxable property as equalized or assessed by the 6Department of Revenue in the case of districts maintaining 7grades K-8 or 9-12 and 0.30% of the value of taxable property 8as equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue in the 9case of districts maintaining grades K-12. This limitation on 10taxing authority is expressly applicable to taxing authority 11provided under Section 17-9 and other applicable Sections of 12this Act. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be 13construed as an exception to the property tax limitations 14contained in Section 17-2, 17-2.2a, 17-5, or any other 15applicable Section of this Act.16    Neither the bonds or notes nor the obligation to pay the 17bonds or notes under any joint agreement shall constitute an 18indebtedness of any district within the meaning of any 19constitutional or statutory limitation.20    As long as any bonds or notes are outstanding and unpaid, 21the obligation of a district to pay its proportionate share of 22the principal of and interest on the bonds and notes as 23required in this Section shall be a general obligation of the 24district payable from any and all sources of revenue 25designated for that purpose by the board of education of the 26district and shall be irrevocable notwithstanding the   HB2390 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1district's withdrawal from membership in the joint special 2education program.3    (g) A member district wishing to withdraw from a joint 4agreement may obtain from its school board a written 5resolution approving the withdrawal. The withdrawing district 6must then present a written petition for withdrawal from the 7joint agreement to the other member districts. Under no 8circumstances may the petition be presented to the other 9member districts less than 12 months from the date of the 10proposed withdrawal, unless the member districts agree to 11waive this timeline. Upon approval by school board written 12resolution of all of the remaining member districts, the 13petitioning member district shall notify the State Board of 14Education of the approved withdrawal in writing and must 15submit a comprehensive plan developed under subsection (g-5) 16for review by the State Board. If the petition for withdrawal 17is not approved, the petitioning member district may appeal 18the disapproval decision to the trustees of schools of the 19township that has jurisdiction and authority over the 20withdrawing district. If a withdrawing district is not under 21the jurisdiction and authority of the trustees of schools of a 22township, a hearing panel shall be established by the chief 23administrative officer of the intermediate service center 24having jurisdiction over the withdrawing district. The hearing 25panel shall be made up of 3 persons who have a demonstrated 26interest and background in education. Each hearing panel   HB2390 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1member must reside within an educational service region of 22,000,000 or more inhabitants but not within the withdrawing 3district and may not be a current school board member or 4employee of the withdrawing district or hold any county 5office. None of the hearing panel members may reside within 6the same school district. The hearing panel shall serve 7without remuneration; however, the necessary expenses, 8including travel, attendant upon any meeting or hearing in 9relation to these proceedings must be paid. Prior to the 10hearing, the withdrawing district shall (i) provide written 11notification to all parents or guardians of students with 12disabilities residing within the district of its intent to 13withdraw from the special education joint agreement; (ii) hold 14a public hearing to allow for members of the community, 15parents or guardians of students with disabilities, or any 16other interested parties an opportunity to review the plan for 17educating students after the withdrawal and to provide 18feedback on the plan; and (iii) prepare and provide a 19comprehensive plan as outlined under subsection (g-5). The 20trustees of schools of the township having jurisdiction and 21authority over the withdrawing district or the hearing panel 22established by the chief administrative officer of the 23intermediate service center having jurisdiction over the 24withdrawing district shall convene and hear testimony to 25determine whether the withdrawing district has presented 26sufficient evidence that the district, standing alone, will   HB2390 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1provide a full continuum of services and support to all its 2students with disabilities in the foreseeable future. If the 3trustees of schools of the township having jurisdiction and 4authority over the withdrawing district or the hearing panel 5established by the chief administrative officer of the 6intermediate service center having jurisdiction over the 7withdrawing district approves the petition for withdrawal, 8then the petitioning member district shall be withdrawn from 9the joint agreement effective the following July 1 and shall 10notify the State Board of Education of the approved withdrawal 11in writing.12    (g-5) Each withdrawing district shall develop a 13comprehensive plan that includes the administrative policies 14and procedures outlined in Sections 226.50, 226.100, 226.110, 15226.180, 226.230, 226.250, 226.260, 226.300, 226.310, 226.320, 16226.330, 226.340, 226.350, 226.500, 226.520, 226.530, 226.540, 17226.560, 226.700, 226.740, 226.800, and 226.820 and Subpart G 18of Part 226 of Title 23 of the Illinois Administrative Code and 19all relevant portions of the federal Individuals with 20Disabilities Education Act. The withdrawing district must also 21demonstrate its ability to provide education for a wide range 22of students with disabilities, including a full continuum of 23support and services. To demonstrate an appropriate plan for 24educating all currently enrolled students with disabilities 25upon withdrawal from the joint agreement, the withdrawing 26district must provide a written plan for educating and placing   HB2390 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1all currently eligible students with disabilities. 2    (h) The changes to this Section made by Public Act 96-783 3apply to withdrawals from or dissolutions of special education 4joint agreements initiated after August 28, 2009 (the 5effective date of Public Act 96-783). 6    (i) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (g), and (h) of this 7Section or any other provision of this Code to the contrary, an 8elementary school district that maintains grades up to and 9including grade 8, that had a 2014-2015 best 3 months' average 10daily attendance of 5,209.57, and that had a 2014 equalized 11assessed valuation of at least $451,500,000, but not more than 12$452,000,000, may withdraw from its special education joint 13agreement program consisting of 6 school districts upon 14submission and approval of the comprehensive plan, in 15compliance with the applicable requirements of Section 14-4.01 16of this Code, in addition to the approval by the school board 17of the elementary school district and notification to and the 18filing of an intent to withdraw statement with the governing 19board of the joint agreement program. Such notification and 20statement shall specify the effective date of the withdrawal, 21which in no case shall be less than 60 days after the date of 22the filing of the notification and statement. Upon receipt of 23the notification and statement, the governing board of the 24joint agreement program shall distribute a copy to each member 25district of the joint agreement and shall initiate any 26appropriate allocation of assets and liabilities among the   HB2390 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1remaining member districts to take effect upon the date of the 2withdrawal. The withdrawal shall take effect upon the date 3specified in the notification and statement. 4    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for any 5member district entering into, amending, renewing, or 6withdrawing from a joint agreement after the effective date of 7this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 8following criteria shall be met:9        (1) For a member district withdrawing from a joint 10    agreement, the member district's school board shall hold a 11    public hearing on the member district's intent to withdraw 12    at least 18 months before the member district's proposed 13    withdrawal date. A written notice of the member district's 14    intent to withdraw and the details of the public hearing 15    shall be sent to the other member districts of the joint 16    agreement no less than 10 days before the public hearing.17        (2) A member district that intends to withdraw from a 18    joint agreement shall adopt a comprehensive plan in 19    accordance with subsection (g-5). The plan shall be 20    submitted to the member district's regional office of 21    education or intermediate service center, whichever is 22    applicable, and shall be accompanied by evidence of the 23    public hearing conducted under paragraph (1) of this 24    subsection (j) and a copy of the approved resolution to 25    withdraw.26        (3) Upon the receipt of a member district's   HB2390 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1    comprehensive plan under paragraph (2) of this subsection 2    (j), the regional superintendent of schools or the 3    executive director of the intermediate service center, 4    whichever is applicable, shall ensure the following 5    criteria are met:6            (A) notice of withdrawal was provided to all 7        member districts;8            (B) a public hearing that complies with paragraph 9        (1) of this subsection (j) was held by the withdrawing 10        member district's school board;11            (C) a resolution has been passed by the 12        withdrawing member district's school board; and13            (D) a comprehensive plan for the withdrawing 14        member district that complies with subsection (g-5) is 15        in place.16        Upon certification that the criteria in this paragraph 17    (3) have been satisfied, the regional superintendent of 18    schools or the executive director of the intermediate 19    service center shall notify the State Board of Education 20    and the other member districts of the joint agreement of 21    his or her approval of the member district's withdrawal.22        If any of the criteria in items (A) through (D) of this 23    paragraph (3) have not been satisfied, the regional 24    superintendent of schools or the executive director of the 25    intermediate service center shall notify the withdrawing 26    member district of the outstanding criteria to be   HB2390 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1    satisfied and the process for resubmission of the member 2    district's withdrawal plan.3        (4) A joint agreement shall include (i) provisions for 4    the dissolution of assets in the event the joint agreement 5    is dissolved and (ii) provisions for the distribution of 6    assets in the event a member district withdraws from the 7    joint agreement. Upon its withdrawal from a joint 8    agreement, a member district shall waive any claims to the 9    joint agreement's assets, except for any assets designated 10    for distribution upon the dissolution of the joint 11    agreement. A withdrawn member district shall, within 12 12    months after withdrawal, remit payment to the joint 13    agreement for its proportional share of any debt or 14    liabilities incurred by the joint agreement prior to the 15    member district's notice of withdrawal.16        (5) A joint agreement shall include a requirement for 17    an annual presentation of the joint agreement's fiscal 18    year budget and the calculation of member and usage fees 19    to all member districts. 20    A school district that meets all of the requirements of 21this subsection (j) shall be withdrawn from the joint 22agreement on the date that the school district specifies in 23both the notice sent to other school districts pursuant to the 24joint agreement and the resolution passed by the board as long 25as the notice was given at least 18 months before, as specified 26in paragraph (1) of this subsection (j), the date specified.   HB2390 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08356 LNS 18407 b1(Source: P.A. 100-66, eff. 8-11-17; 101-164, eff. 7-26-19.)